Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.43.020

Public lands subject to local assessments.

In addition to the authority provided by chapter 35.44 RCW, and chapter 79.44 RCW, a code city may assess public lands for the cost of local improvements specially benefiting such lands.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.43.020.]